Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201560-309.01
Autocycle, defined.

Autocycle means any motor vehicle (1) having a seat that does not require the operator to straddle or sit astride it, (2) designed to travel on three wheels in contact with the ground, (3) in which the operator and passenger ride either side by side or in tandem in a seating area that is completely enclosed with a removable or fixed top and is equipped with manufacturer-installed air bags, a manufacturer-installed roll cage, and for each occupant a manufacturer-installed three-point safety belt system, (4) having antilock brakes, and (5) designed to be controlled with a steering wheel and pedals.

Laws 2015, LB231, § 8.
August 30, 2015